Utah statutes.
78B-6-1218.   Liens on undivided interests -- Apportionment.

A lien on an undivided interest or estate of any of the parties shall only be a charge on the share assigned to the party after the share is charged with its just proportion of the costs of the partition in preference to the lien.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

